New York, session 2025-2026, A11235.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of 2 section 268-d of the public health law, as added by section 2 of part T 3 of chapter 57 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 4 (ii) offers at least one qualified health plan and/or other or addi- 5 tional health plans authorized for sale by the department of financial 6 services or the department in each of the silver and gold levels as 7 required by state law and offers at least one qualified dental plan or 8 dental plan approved for sale by the department of financial services 9 and/or the department for individuals age sixty-five and older, 10 provided, however, that the Marketplace may require additional benefit 11 levels to be offered by all insurers participating in the Marketplace; 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 13 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11752-01-5